Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.06, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Mandatory reporters. (a) A person who knows or has reason to believe a child is being maltreated, as defined in section 260E.03, or has been maltreated deleted text begin within the preceding three yearsdeleted text end shall immediately report the information to the local welfare agency, agency responsible for assessing or investigating the report, police department, county sheriff, tribal social services agency, or tribal police department if the person is: (1) a professional or professional's delegate who is engaged in the practice of the healing arts, social services, hospital administration, psychological or psychiatric treatment, child care, education, correctional supervision, probation and correctional services, or law enforcement; or (2) deleted text begin employeddeleted text end new text begin servingnew text end as a member of the clergy deleted text begin and received the information while engaged in ministerial dutiesdeleted text end new text begin or other minister of any religion, with or without financial compensationnew text end , provided that a member of the clergynew text begin or other minister of any religionnew text end is not required by this subdivision to report information that is otherwise privileged under section 595.02, subdivision 1, paragraph (c). (b) "Practice of social services" for the purposes of this subdivision includes but is not limited to employee assistance counseling and the provision of guardian ad litem and parenting time expeditor services. (c) A corporation, school, nonprofit organization, religious organization, facility as defined in section 260E.03, subdivision 6, or similar entity must not have any policies, written or otherwise, that prevent or discourage a mandatory or voluntary reporter from reporting suspected or alleged maltreatment of a child in accordance with this section. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.08, is amended to read: 260E.08 CRIMINAL PENALTIES FOR FAILURE TO REPORT; CIVIL PENALTY FOR MAKING FALSE REPORT. (a) A person mandated by section 260E.06, subdivision 1, to report who knows or has reason to believe that a child isnew text begin or has beennew text end maltreated, as defined in section 260E.03, deleted text begin or has been maltreated within the preceding three years,deleted text end and fails to report is guilty of anew text begin grossnew text end misdemeanor. (b) A person mandated by section 260E.06, subdivision 1, to report who knows or has reason to believe that two or more children deleted text begin not related to the offenderdeleted text end have been maltreated, as defined in section 260E.03, by the same offender deleted text begin within the preceding ten years,deleted text end and fails to report is guilty of a deleted text begin gross misdemeanordeleted text end new text begin felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years or to payment of a fine of not more than $4,000, or bothnew text end . (c) A parent, guardian, or caretaker who knows or reasonably should know that the child's health is in serious danger and who fails to report as required by section 260E.06, subdivision 3, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the child suffers substantial or great bodily harm because of the lack of medical care. If the child dies because of the lack of medical care, the person is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years or to payment of a fine of not more than $4,000, or both. The provision in section 609.378, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1), providing that a parent, guardian, or caretaker may, in good faith, select and depend on spiritual means or prayer for treatment or care of a child, does not exempt a parent, guardian, or caretaker from the duty to report under this chapter. (d) Any person who knowingly or recklessly makes a false report under the provisions of this chapter shall be liable in a civil suit for any actual damages suffered by the person or persons so reported and for any punitive damages set by the court or jury, plus costs and reasonable attorney fees. (e) A person who intentionally prevents or attempts to prevent a person mandated by section 260E.06, subdivision 1, to report under this chapter is guilty of anew text begin grossnew text end misdemeanor.